tr: Aks körüğü kit içeriği: Körük + kelepçeler; Körük + kelepçeler + gres; Körük + kelepçeler + gres + koni aleti; Körük + kelepçeler + gres + donanım (klips/tutucu); Körük + gres; Sadece körük; Diğer
fr: Contenu du kit de soufflet de cardan: Soufflet et colliers; Soufflet, colliers et graisse; Soufflet, colliers, graisse et cône de montage; Soufflet, colliers, graisse et matériel (clips/attaches); Soufflet et graisse; Soufflet uniquement; Autre
ro-RO: Conținut kit protecție CV: Burduf + coliere; Burduf + coliere + vaselină; Burduf + coliere + vaselină + unealtă conică; Burduf + coliere + vaselină + elemente de fixare (cleme/siguranțe); Burduf + vaselină; Doar burduf; Altele
it: Contenuto del kit di avvio CV: Cuffia + fascette; Cuffia + fascette + grasso; Cuffia + fascette + grasso + attrezzo a cono; Cuffia + fascette + grasso + minuteria (clip/fermi); Cuffia + grasso; Solo cuffia; Altro
da: Indhold til drivakselmanchet-sættet: Manchet + klemmer; Manchet + klemmer + fedt; Manchet + klemmer + fedt + konusværktøj; Manchet + klemmer + fedt + hardware (clips/holdere); Manchet + fedt; Kun manchet; Andet
ko: CV 부트 키트 구성품: 부츠 + 클램프; 부츠 + 클램프 + 그리스; 부츠 + 클램프 + 그리스 + 콘 툴; 부츠 + 클램프 + 그리스 + 하드웨어(클립/리테이너); 부츠 + 그리스; 부츠만; 기타
pl: Zawartość zestawu osłony przegubu CV: Osłona + opaski; Osłona + opaski + smar; Osłona + opaski + smar + stożek montażowy; Osłona + opaski + smar + osprzęt (klipsy / elementy ustalające); Osłona + smar; Tylko osłona; Inne
lt-LT: CV manžetės rinkinio turinys: Apsauginė guma + apkabos; Apsauginė guma + apkabos + tepalas; Apsauginė guma + apkabos + tepalas + kūginis įrankis; Apsauginė guma + apkabos + tepalas + tvirtinimo detalės (fiksatoriai / laikikliai); Apsauginė guma + tepalas; Tik apsauginė guma; Kita
nl: CV-hoes set inhoud: Hoes + klemmen; Hoes + klemmen + vet; Hoes + klemmen + vet + montagekegel; Hoes + klemmen + vet + hardware (clips/bevestigingen); Hoes + vet; Alleen hoes; Overig
ja: CVブートキットコンテンツ: ブーツ + クランプ; ブーツ + クランプ + グリース; ブーツ + クランプ + グリース + コーンツール; ブーツ + クランプ + グリース + ハードウェア (クリップ / リテーナー); ブーツ + グリース; ブーツのみ; その他
el: Περιεχόμενα κιτ φούσκας ημιαξονίου: Φούσκα και σφιγκτήρες; Φούσκα, σφιγκτήρες και γράσο; Φούσκα, σφιγκτήρες, γράσο και εργαλείο κώνου; Φούσκα, σφιγκτήρες, γράσο και εξαρτήματα (κλιπ/ασφάλειες); Φούσκα και γράσο; Μόνο φούσκα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Kompletna manžeta homokineze Sadržaj: Manšeta + obujmice; Manšeta + obujmice + mast; Manšeta + obujmice + mast + alat s konusom; Manšeta + obujmice + mast + hardver (kopče/držači); Manšeta + mast; Samo manšeta; Ostalo
de: Inhalt des CV-Manschettensatzes: Manschette + Klemmen; Manschette + Klemmen + Schmierfett; Manschette + Klemmen + Schmierfett + Montagekegel; Manschette + Klemmen + Schmierfett + Hardware (Clips/Halterungen); Manschette + Schmierfett; Nur Manschette; Sonstige
zh-TW: CV 防塵套套件內容: 防塵套 + 夾具; 防塵套 + 夾具 + 潤滑脂; 防塵套 + 夾具 + 潤滑脂 + 錐形工具; 防塵套 + 夾具 + 潤滑脂 + 硬體 (夾子/固定件); 防塵套 + 潤滑脂; 僅防塵套; 其他
cs: Manžeta homokinetického kloubu (CV): Manžeta + spony; Manžeta + spony + mazivo; Manžeta + spony + mazivo + montážní kužel; Manžeta + spony + mazivo + montážní díly (spony/pojistky); Manžeta + mazivo; Pouze manžeta; Jiné
th: ส่วนประกอบภายในชุดยางหุ้มเพลาขับ: ยางกันฝุ่น + แคลมป์; ยางกันฝุ่น + แคลมป์ + จาระบี; ยางกันฝุ่น + แคลมป์ + จาระบี + กรวยใส่ยาง; ยางกันฝุ่น + แคลมป์ + จาระบี + ฮาร์ดแวร์ (คลิป/ตัวยึด); ยางกันฝุ่น + จาระบี; ยางกันฝุ่นเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
sv: CV- kit Innehåll: Dammask + klämmor; Dammask + klämmor + fett; Dammask + klämmor + fett + monteringskon; Dammask + klämmor + fett + monteringsdetaljer (clips/hållare); Dammask + fett; Endast dammask; Annat
pt-BR: Conteúdo do kit da coifa da junta homocinética: Coifa e abraçadeiras; Coifa, abraçadeiras e graxa; Coifa, abraçadeiras, graxa e ferramenta de cone; Coifa, abraçadeiras, graxa e ferragens (clipes/retentores); Coifa e graxa; Apenas coifa; Outros
bg-BG: Съдържание на комплект за маншон на каре: Маншон + скоби; Маншон + скоби + грес; Маншон + скоби + грес + инструмент конус; Маншон + скоби + грес + крепежни елементи (щипки/фиксатори); Маншон + грес; Само маншон; Други
en: CV boot kit contents: Boot + clamps; Boot + clamps + grease; Boot + clamps + grease + cone tool; Boot + clamps + grease + hardware (clips/retainers); Boot + grease; Boot only; Other
vi: Nội dung bộ bọc trục CV: Cao su chụp bụi + kẹp; Cao su chụp bụi + kẹp + mỡ bò; Cao su chụp bụi + kẹp + mỡ bò + dụng cụ hình nón; Cao su chụp bụi + kẹp + mỡ bò + phụ kiện (kẹp/chốt giữ); Cao su chụp bụi + mỡ bò; Chỉ cao su chụp bụi; Khác
zh-CN: CV 防尘套套件所含物品: 防尘套 + 卡箍; 防尘套 + 卡箍 + 润滑脂; 防尘套 + 卡箍 + 润滑脂 + 锥形工具; 防尘套 + 卡箍 + 润滑脂 + 硬件（卡子/挡圈）; 防尘套 + 润滑脂; 仅防尘套; 其他
pt-PT: Conteúdo do kit de exaustor da junta homocinética: Fole + abraçadeiras; Fole + abraçadeiras + massa lubrificante; Fole + abraçadeiras + massa lubrificante + ferramenta de cone; Fole + abraçadeiras + massa lubrificante + ferragens (clipes/retentores); Fole + massa lubrificante; Apenas fole; Outro
ru: Содержимое комплекта пыльника ШРУСа: Пыльник + хомуты; Пыльник + хомуты + смазка; Пыльник + хомуты + смазка + монтажный конус; Пыльник + хомуты + смазка + крепеж (зажимы/фиксаторы); Пыльник + смазка; Только пыльник; Другое
hu: CV gumiharangkészlet tartalma: Gumiharang + bilincsek; Gumiharang + bilincsek + zsír; Gumiharang + bilincsek + zsír + szerelőkúp; Gumiharang + bilincsek + zsír + szerelékek (kapcsok/rögzítők); Gumiharang + zsír; Csak gumiharang; Egyéb
fi: Vetonivelen suojakumipakkauksen sisältö: Suojakumi ja kiinnikkeet; Suojakumi, kiinnikkeet ja rasva; Suojakumi, kiinnikkeet, rasva ja asennuskartio; Suojakumi, kiinnikkeet, rasva ja asennustarvikkeet (sokat/pidikkeet); Suojakumi ja rasva; Vain suojakumi; Muu
es: Contenido del kit del fuelle de la junta homocinética: Fuelle + abrazaderas; Fuelle + abrazaderas + grasa; Fuelle + abrazaderas + grasa + cono de montaje; Fuelle + abrazaderas + grasa + tornillería (clips/retenedores); Fuelle + grasa; Solo fuelle; Otro
nb: CV-mansjettsett innhold: Mansjett + klemmer; Mansjett + klemmer + fett; Mansjett + klemmer + fett + kon-verktøy; Mansjett + klemmer + fett + maskinvare (klips/fester); Mansjett + fett; Kun mansjett; Annet
sl-SI: Vsebina kompleta manšet homokinetičnega zgloba: Manšeta in objemke; Manšeta, objemke in mast; Manšeta, objemke, mast in stožčasto orodje; Manšeta, objemke, mast in pritrdilni material (sponke); Manšeta in mast; Samo manšeta; Drugo
sk-SK: Obsah súpravy manžety homokinetického kĺbu: Manžeta + svorky; Manžeta + svorky + mazivo; Manžeta + svorky + mazivo + kužeľový nástroj; Manžeta + svorky + mazivo + hardvér (spony/príchytky); Manžeta + mazivo; Iba manžeta; Iné